Washington statutes.
RCW 9.68.100

Exceptions to RCW 9.68.050 through 9.68.120.

Nothing in RCW 9.68.050 through 9.68.120 shall apply to the circulation of any such material by any recognized historical society or museum, the state law library, any county law library, the state library, the public library, any library of any college or university, or to any archive or library under the supervision and control of the state, county, municipality, or other political subdivision.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 256: See note following RCW 9.68.050.